Utah statutes.
77-28b-9.   Transfer of offender.
(1)  If the inmate is accepted for international transfer by the United States
Department of Justice, Office of International Affairs, the offender shall be
transported by the Department of Corrections to the federal district court for
a verification hearing to ensure the offender consents to the international
transfer.
(2)  The Department of Corrections shall then relinquish jurisdiction over the
offender to the United States Department of Justice.
